Massachusetts, session 194th, H872.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Chapter 356 of the acts of 1983 is hereby amended by striking out the
words “fourteen days” in the last sentence of the first paragraph of section 2 and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- thirty days.
SECTION 2: Said section 2 of said chapter 356 is hereby amended by striking out the
words “twenty per cent” in the last sentence of the first paragraph of section 2 and inserting in
place there of the following words:- ten per cent.
SECTION 3: Section 3 of said chapter 356 is hereby amended by striking out the first
sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- If the petition shall be found and
certified by the town clerk to be sufficient they shall submit the same with their certificate to the
of 2

select board without delay, and said board shall forthwith give written notice of the receipt of the
certificate to the officer sought to be recalled and shall, if the officer does not resign within five
days thereafter, order the recall election to be held at the next scheduled town election, provided
the next town election is scheduled more than sixty-four days from the date said officer resigns
or refuses to resign.
SECTION 5: The fourth sentence of section 6 of said chapter 356 is hereby amended by
striking out the words “; provided that at least forty per cent of those entitled to vote shall have
voted”.
SECTION 6: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2